Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.402

Department to advance private sector, economic well-being of agricultural industry.

The department shall seek to enhance, protect, and perpetuate the ability of the private sector to produce food and fiber. Additionally, the department shall seek, consistent with its regulatory responsibilities, to maintain the economic well-being of the agricultural industry and its dependent rural community in Washington state.

[ 1994 c 46 s 10; 1991 c 280 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.